Washington statutes.
RCW 16.68.060

Independent collector license fee.

Any person engaged in the business of independent collector shall secure from the director an annual independent collector license and pay an annual fee of fifty dollars.

[ 1949 c 100 s 6; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 3142-6.]